dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="sk/jære__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>åren</l>      <r>jære<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>året</l>      <r>jære<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>året</l>      <r>jære<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>årne</l>      <r>jære<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>årne</l>      <r>jære<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jærende</l>   <r>jære<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hit/re__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>terste</l>    <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>terst</l>     <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nyankom/met__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>met<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>met<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>met<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>met<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>met<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>met<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>met<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ban/ne__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nede</l>      <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nede</l>      <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nende</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nete</l>      <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nete</l>      <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pis/se__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>sa</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sa</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sa</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sa</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sede</l>      <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sede</l>      <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sende</l>     <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sete</l>      <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sete</l>      <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tidlig__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="øv/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tøm/me__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>mende</l>     <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/ille__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ille</l>      <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ille</l>      <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ille</l>      <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ille</l>      <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>verre</l>     <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>verste</l>    <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>verst</l>     <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="heimkommet">      <i>heimkom</i><par n="nyankom/met__adj"/></e>
<e lm="finskjære">       <i>finsk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="finstemme">       <i>finstem</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bløtaktig">       <i>bløtaktig</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="høve">            <i>høv</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="drysse">          <i>drys</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="idømme">          <i>idøm</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hive">            <i>hiv</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hørverdig">       <i>hørverdig</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsømme">        <i>forsøm</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grøde">           <i>grød</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ille">            <i></i><par n="/ille__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dønne">           <i>døn</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bortkommet">      <i>bortkom</i><par n="nyankom/met__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beskjære">        <i>besk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grøsse">          <i>grøs</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avlønne">         <i>avløn</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="belesse">         <i>beles</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="håndskjære">      <i>håndsk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="høgalkalisk">     <i>høgalkalisk</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hjemkommet">      <i>hjemkom</i><par n="nyankom/met__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjemme">          <i>gjem</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fortøye">         <i>fortøy</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="drønne">          <i>drøn</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glemme">          <i>glem</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heimattkommet">   <i>heimattkom</i><par n="nyankom/met__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forbanne">        <i>forban</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avskjære">        <i>avsk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjennomprøve">    <i>gjennomprøv</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dyslektisk">      <i>dyslektisk</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="belønne">         <i>beløn</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="feilbedømme">     <i>feilbedøm</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="drøye">           <i>drøy</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="banne">           <i>ban</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hitre">           <i>hit</i><par n="hit/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uerklært">        <i>uerklært</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skjære">          <i>sk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tidsbøye">        <i>tidsbøy</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trollstemme">     <i>trollstem</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="slakteferdig">    <i>slakteferdig</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilårskommet">    <i>tilårskom</i><par n="nyankom/met__adj"/></e>
<e lm="støvfylt">        <i>støvfylt</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="typebestemme">    <i>typebestem</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="viderekommet">    <i>viderekom</i><par n="nyankom/met__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uartig">          <i>uartig</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="svive">           <i>sviv</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stønne">          <i>støn</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sukkerholdig">    <i>sukkerholdig</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skamskjære">      <i>skamsk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stemme">          <i>stem</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utfattig">        <i>utfattig</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overskjære">      <i>oversk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overstemme">      <i>overstem</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pisse">           <i>pis</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kysse">           <i>kys</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="misse">           <i>mis</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="omskjære">        <i>omsk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prisbelønne">     <i>prisbeløn</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lesse">           <i>les</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kløyve">          <i>kløyv</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppkjøpt">        <i>oppkjøpt</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="renskjære">       <i>rensk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="minne">           <i>min</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="reinskjære">      <i>reinsk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nedskjære">       <i>nedsk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyankommet">      <i>nyankom</i><par n="nyankom/met__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overdrysse">      <i>overdrys</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="neddemme">        <i>neddem</i><par n="tøm/me__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nenne">           <i>nen</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prosentlønne">    <i>prosentløn</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prøve">           <i>prøv</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påspedd">         <i>påspedd</i><par n="tidlig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innskjære">       <i>innsk</i><par n="sk/jære__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overlesse">       <i>overles</i><par n="pis/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lønne">           <i>løn</i><par n="ban/ne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sammenføye">      <i>sammenføy</i><par n="øv/e__adj"/></e>
